Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1107.01
Jurors; permitted to take notes; use; destruction.

Jurors shall be permitted, but not required, to take notes. The notes may be used during the jury's deliberations and shall be treated as confidential between the juror making them and the other jurors. The notes shall not be preserved in any form. The trial judge shall ensure the confidentiality of the notes during the course of the trial and the jury's deliberations and shall instruct the bailiff to immediately mutilate and destroy such notes upon return of the verdict.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 71;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 37.